en: Unknown
af: Onbekend
ar: غير معروف
az: Bilinmir
be: Невядомы
bg: Неизвестно
bn: অজানা
ca: Desconegut
cs: Neznámý
da: Ukendt
de: Unbekannt
el: Άγνωστος
es: Desconocido
et: Tundmatu
fa: ناشناخته
fi: Tuntematon
fr: Inconnu, inconnue, inconnus, inconnues
he: לא ידוע
hi: अज्ञात
hr: Nepoznato
hu: Ismeretlen
id: Tidak diketahui
is: Óþekkt
it: Sconosciuta, Sconosciuto
ja: 不明
ko: 알 수 없음
lt: Nežinomas
lv: Nezināms
mk: Непознат
ms: Tidak diketahui
nl: Onbekend
no: Ukjent
pl: Nieznany, Nieznane
pt: Desconhecido
ro: Necunoscut
ru: Неизвестно
sk: Neznámy
sl: Neznano
sq: Panjohur
sr: Непознато
sv: Okänd
th: ไม่รู้จัก
tr: Bilinmiyor
uk: Невідомо
ur: نامعلوم
vi: Không xác định
zh: 未知

en: Unspecified, not specified, non specified, nonspecified, not available, n/a
ar: غير محدد, غير مذكور
az: Müəyyən edilməyib, qeyd olunmayıb
bg: Неуточнено, не е налично, не е посочено
bn: অনির্দিষ্ট, উপলব্ধ নয়, উল্লেখ করা হয়নি
ca: No especificat
cs: Neurčeno, není k dispozici, není uvedeno
da: Ikke specificeret, ikke tilgængeligt, ikke angivet
de: Unspezifiziert, nicht verfügbar, nicht angegeben
el: Μη καθορισμένο, μη διαθέσιμο, μη υποδειγμένο
es: No especificado
et: Täpsustamata, saadaval, määratlemata
fa: تعیین نشده, در دسترس نیست, مشخص نشده
fi: Määrittelemätön, ei saatavilla, ei määritelty
fr: Non indiqué, non indiquée, non indiqués, non indiquées, non spécifié, non spécifiée, non spécifiée, non spécifiées, non précisé, non précisée, non précisés, non précisées
he: לא מוגדר, לא זמין, לא צוין
hi: अनिर्दिष्ट, अनुपलब्ध, निर्दिष्ट नहीं
hu: Nincs megadva, kitöltetlen, nem elérhető
id: Tidak ditentukan, tidak tersedia, tidak ditentukan
it: Non specificata, non specificato
ja: 不特定, 利用できません, 指定されていません
ko: 지정되지 않음, 사용할 수 없음, 지정되지 않음
nl: Niet-gespecificeerd
pl: Nieokreślony, niedostępny, nie podano
pt: Não especificado
ru: Не указано, недоступно, не указано
tr: Belirtilmemiş, mevcut değil, belirtilmemiş
zh: 未指定，不可用，未指定

en: Africa
af: Afrika
ar: أفريقيا
az: Afrika
be: Афрыка
bg: Африка
bn: আফ্রিকা
ca: Àfrica
cs: Afrika
da: Afrika
de: Afrika
el: Αφρική
es: África
et: Aafrika
fa: آفریقا
fi: Afrikka
fr: Afrique
he: אפריקה
hi: अफ्रीका
hr: Afrika
hu: Afrika
id: Afrika
it: Africa
ja: アフリカ
ko: 아프리카
lt: Afrika
lv: Āfrika
mk: Африка
nl: Afrika
no: Afrika
pl: Afryka
pt: África
ro: Africa
ru: Африка
sk: Afrika
sl: Afrika
sq: Afrikë
sr: Африка
sv: Afrika
sw: Afrika
th: แอฟริกา
tr: Afrika
uk: Африка
ur: افریقہ
vi: Châu Phi
zh: 非洲

en: West Africa
ar: غرب أفريقيا
az: Qərbi Afrika
bg: Западна Африка
bn: পশ্চিম আফ্রিকা
ca: Àfrica Occidental
da: Vestafrika
de: Westafrika
es: África Occidental
fr: Afrique de l'Ouest
hu: Nyugat-Afrika
it: Africa Occidentale
ja: 西アフリカ
nl: West-Afrika
pl: Afryka Zachodnia
pt: África Ocidental
ru: Западная Африка
tr: Batı Afrika
zh: 西非

en: Latin America
ar: أمريكا اللاتينية
az: Latın Amerika
be: Лацінская Амерыка
bg: Латинска Америка
bn: ল্যাটিন আমেরিকা
ca: Amèrica Llatina
cs: Latinská Amerika
da: Latinamerika
de: Lateinamerika
el: Λατινική Αμερική
es: América Latina
et: Ladina-Ameerika
fa: آمریکای لاتین
fi: Latinalainen Amerikka
fr: Amérique Latine
he: אמריקה הלטינית
hi: लैटिन अमेरिका
hr: Latinska Amerika
hu: Latin-Amerika
id: Amerika Latin
it: America Latina
ja: ラテンアメリカ
ko: 라틴 아메리카
lt: Lotynų Amerika
lv: Latīņamerika
mk: Латинска Америка
ms: Amerika Latin
nl: Latijns-Amerika
no: Latin-Amerika
pl: Ameryka Łacińska
pt: América Latina
ro: America Latină
ru: Латинская Америка
sk: Latinská Amerika
sl: Latinska Amerika
sq: Amerika Latine
sr: Латинска Америка
sv: Latinamerika
th: ละตินอเมริกา
tr: Latin Amerika
uk: Латинська Америка
ur: لاطینی امریکہ
vi: Mỹ Latinh
zh: 拉丁美洲

en: Central America
ar: أمريكا الوسطى
az: Mərkəzi Amerika
bg: Централна Америка
bn: মধ্য আমেরিকা
ca: Amèrica Central
da: Centralamerika
de: Zentralamerika
es: América Central
fr: Amérique centrale
hu: Közép-Amerika
it: America Centrale
ja: 中央アメリカ
nl: Centraal-Amerika
pl: Ameryka Środkowa, Ameryka Centralna
pt: América Central
ru: Центральная Америка
tr: Orta Amerika
zh: 中美洲

en: North-America
af: Noord-Amerika
ar: أمريكا الشمالية
az: Şimali Amerika
be: Паўночная Амерыка
bg: Северна Америка
bn: উত্তর আমেরিকা
ca: Amèrica del Nord
cs: Severní Amerika
da: Nordamerika
de: Nordamerika
el: Βόρεια Αμερική
es: América del Norte
et: Põhja-Ameerika
fa: آمریکای شمالی
fi: Pohjois-Amerikka
fr: Amérique du Nord
he: צפון אמריקה
hi: उत्तरी अमेरिका
hr: Sjeverna Amerika
hu: Észak-Amerika
id: Amerika Utara
it: America del Nord
ja: 北アメリカ
ko: 북아메리카
lt: Šiaurės Amerika
lv: Ziemeļamerika
nl: Noord-Amerika
pl: Ameryka Północna
pt: América do Norte
ro: America de Nord
ru: Северная Америка
sk: Severná Amerika
sl: Severna Amerika
sq: Amerika e Veriut
sr: Северна Америка
sv: Nordamerika
tr: Kuzey Amerika
uk: Північна Америка
zh: 北美洲

en: South-America
ar: أمريكا الجنوبية
az: Cənubi Amerika
bg: Южна Америка
bn: দক্ষিণ আমেরিকা
ca: Sud Amèrica
da: Sydamerika
de: Südamerika
es: Sudamérica
fr: Amérique du Sud
hu: Dél-Amerika
it: America del Sud
ja: 南アメリカ
nl: Zuid-Amerika
pl: Ameryka Południowa
pt: América do Sul
ru: Южная Америка
tr: Güney Amerika
zh: 南美洲

en: Asia
af: Asië
ar: آسيا
az: Asiya
be: Азія
bg: Азия
bn: এশিয়া
ca: Àsia
cs: Asie
da: Asien
de: Asien
el: Ασία
es: Asia
et: Aasia
fa: آسیا
fi: Aasia
fr: Asie
he: אסיה
hi: एशिया
hr: Azija
hu: Ázsia
id: Asia
it: Asia
ja: アジア
ko: 아시아
lt: Azija
lv: Āzija
nl: Azië
pl: Azja
pt: Ásia
ro: Asia
ru: Азия
sk: Ázia
sl: Azija
sq: Azi
sr: Азија
sv: Asien
sw: Asia
th: เอเชีย
tr: Asya
uk: Азія
ur: ایشیا
vi: Châu Á
zh: 亚洲

en: Chiba Prefecture
af: Chiba Prefektuur
ar: تشيبا
az: Çiba prefekturası
ba: Тиба (префектура)
be: прэфектура Тыба
bg: Чиба
bn: চিবা প্রশাসনিক অঞ্চল
ca: prefectura de Chiba
ce: Тиба (префектура)
cs: Prefektura Čiba
cy: Chiba
da: Chiba-præfekturet
de: Präfektur Chiba
el: Τσίμπα
eo: Gubernio Ĉiba
es: Prefectura de Chiba
et: Chiba prefektuur
eu: Chiba
fa: استان چیبا
fi: Chiban prefektuuri
fr: préfecture de Chiba
ga: Maoracht Chiba
gl: Prefectura de Chiba
gu: ચિબા પ્રીફેકચર
he: צ'יבה
hi: शिबा प्रीफेक्चर
hr: Chiba
hu: Csiba prefektúra
hy: Թիբա (պրեֆեկտուրա)
id: Prefektur Chiba
it: prefettura di Chiba
ja: 千葉県, 千葉
jv: Prefektur Chiba
ka: ტიბის პრეფექტურა
km: ខេត្តឈីបា
kn: ಚಿಬಾ ಪ್ರಿಫೆಕ್ಚರ್
ko: 지바현
la: Tiba
lt: Čibos prefektūra
lv: Čibas prefektūra
mk: Чиба
mn: Чиба-кэн
mr: चिबा
ms: Wilayah Chiba
nb: Chiba prefektur
nl: Chiba
nn: Chiba prefektur
oc: Prefectura de Chiba
pl: Prefektura Chiba
pt: Chiba
ro: Prefectura Chiba
ru: Тиба
se: Chiba prefektuvra
sh: Prefektura Čiba
si: චිබා ප්‍රාන්තය
sk: Čiba
sl: prefektura Čiba
sr: Чиба
su: Préféktur Chiba
sv: Chiba prefektur
sw: Mkoa wa Chiba
ta: சீபா ப்ரீபெக்ட்டுர்
te: చిబా ప్రిఫెక్చర్
tg: Префектураи Чиба
th: จังหวัดชิบะ
tl: Prepektura ng Chiba
tr: Chiba ili
tt: Тиба (префектура)
ug: چىبا ناھىيەسى
uk: Префектура Чіба
ur: چیبا پریفیکچر
vi: Chiba
zh: 千葉縣

en: Yamagata Prefecture
af: Yamagata Prefektuur
ar: ياماغاتا
az: Yamaqata
ba: Ямагата (префектура)
be: прэфектура Ямагата
bg: Ямагата
bn: ইয়ামাগাতা প্রশাসনিক অঞ্চল
ca: prefectura de Yamagata
ce: Ямагата (префектура)
cs: prefektura Jamagata
cy: Yamagata
da: Yamagata-præfekturet
de: Präfektur Yamagata
el: Νομός Γιαμάγκατα
eo: Gubernio Jamagata
es: Prefectura de Yamagata
et: Yamagata prefektuur
eu: Yamagata
fa: استان یاماگاتا
fi: Yamagatan prefektuuri
fr: préfecture de Yamagata
ga: Maoracht Yamagata
gl: Prefectura de Yamagata
gu: યમાગાતા પ્રીફેકચર
he: יאמאגטה
hi: यामागाटा प्रीफेक्चर
hr: Yamagata
hu: Jamagata prefektúra
hy: Յամագաթա (պրեֆեկտուրա)
id: Prefektur Yamagata
it: prefettura di Yamagata
ja: 山形県, 山形
ka: იამაგატის პრეფექტურა
km: ខេត្តយ៉ាម៉ាកាតា
kn: ಯಮಗಾಟಾ ಪ್ರಿಫೆಕ್ಚರ್
ko: 야마가타현
lt: Jamagatos prefektūra
lv: Jamagatas prefektūra
mk: Јамагата
mn: Ямагата-кэн
mr: यामागाता
ms: Wilayah Yamagata
nb: Yamagata prefektur
nl: Yamagata
nn: Yamagata prefektur
pl: Prefektura Yamagata
pt: Yamagata
ro: Prefectura Yamagata
ru: Ямагата
se: Yamagata prefektuvra
sh: Prefektura Jamagata
si: යමගාටා ප්‍රාන්තය
sk: Jamagata
sl: Jamagata
sr: Јамагата
su: Yamagata Prefecture
sv: Yamagata prefektur
sw: Mkoa wa Yamagata
ta: யமாட்டா ப்ரீபெக்ட்டுறே
te: యమగాతా ప్రిఫెక్చర్
tg: Префектураи Ямагата
th: จังหวัดยามางาตะ
tl: Prepektura ng Yamagata
tr: Yamagata
tt: Ямагата (префектура)
ug: ياماگاتا ناھىيىسى
uk: Префектура Ямаґата
ur: یاماگاتا پرفکترے
uz: Yamagata
vi: Yamagata
zh: 山形縣

en: Kumamoto Prefecture
af: Kumamoto Prefektuur
ar: كوماموتو
az: Kumamoto
ba: Кумамото (префектура)
be: прэфектура Кумамота
bg: Кумамото
bn: কুমামোতো প্রশাসনিক অঞ্চল
ca: prefectura de Kumamoto
ce: Кумамото (префектура)
cs: Prefektura Kumamoto
cy: Kumamoto
da: Kumamoto-præfekturet
de: Präfektur Kumamoto
el: Κουμαμότο
eo: Gubernio Kumamoto
es: prefectura de Kumamoto
et: Kumamoto prefektuur
eu: Kumamoto
fa: استان کوماموتو
fi: Kumamoton prefektuuri
fr: préfecture de Kumamoto
ga: Maoracht Kumamoto
gl: Prefectura de Kumamoto
gu: કુમામોટો પ્રીફેકચર
he: קוממוטו
hi: कुमामोटो प्रान्त
hr: Kumamoto
hu: Kumamoto prefektúra
hy: Կումամոտո (պրեֆեկտուրա)
id: Prefektur Kumamoto
it: prefettura di Kumamoto
ja: 熊本県, 熊本
ka: კუმამოტოს პრეფექტურა
km: ខេត្តឃឹម៉ាម៉ុតុ
kn: ಕುಮಾಮೊಟೊ ಪ್ರಿಫೆಕ್ಚರ್
ko: 구마모토현
lt: Kumamoto prefektūra
lv: Kumamoto prefektūra
mk: Кумамото
mr: कुमामोतो
ms: Wilayah Kumamoto
nb: Kumamoto prefektur
nl: Kumamoto
nn: Kumamoto prefektur
pl: Prefektura Kumamoto
pt: Kumamoto
ro: Prefectura Kumamoto
ru: Кумамото
se: Kumamoto prefektuvra
sh: Prefektura Kumamoto
si: කුමමොටෝ ප්‍රාන්තය
sk: Kumamoto
sl: prefektura Kumamoto
sr: Кумамото
su: Kumamoto Prefecture
sv: Kumamoto prefektur
sw: Mkoa wa Kumamoto
ta: குமமோடோ ப்ரீபெக்ட்டுர்
te: కుమామోటో ప్రిఫెక్చర్
tg: Префектураи Кумамото
th: จังหวัดคูมาโมโตะ
tl: Prepektura ng Kumamoto
tr: Kumamoto
tt: Кумамото (префектура)
uk: Префектура Кумамото
ur: کوماموتو پریفیکچر
vi: Kumamoto
zh: 熊本縣

en: Shiga Prefecture
af: Shiga Prefektuur
ar: شيغا
az: Şiqa
ba: Сига
be: прэфектура Сіга
bg: Шига
bn: শিগা প্রশাসনিক অঞ্চল
ca: prefectura de Shiga
ce: Сига (префектура)
cs: Prefektura Šiga
cy: Shiga
da: Shiga-præfekturet
de: Präfektur Shiga
el: Σίγκα
eo: Gubernio Ŝiga
es: Prefectura de Shiga
et: Shiga prefektuur
eu: Shiga
fa: استان شیگا
fi: Shigan prefektuuri
fr: Préfecture de Shiga
ga: Maoracht Shiga
gl: Prefectura de Shiga
gu: શિગા પ્રીફેકચર
he: שיגה
hi: शिगा प्रीफेक्चर
hr: Shiga
hu: Siga prefektúra
hy: Սիգա (պրեֆեկտուրա)
id: Prefektur Shiga
it: prefettura di Shiga
ja: 滋賀県, 滋賀
jv: Prefektur Shiga
ka: სიგის პრეფექტურა
kn: ಶಿಗಾ ಪ್ರಿಫೆಕ್ಚರ್
ko: 시가현
la: Siga
lt: Šigos prefektūra
lv: Sigas prefektūra
mk: Шига
mn: Шига
mr: शिगा
ms: Wilayah Shiga
my: ရှိဂါ့စီရင်စု
nb: Shiga prefektur
nl: Shiga
nn: Shiga prefektur
pl: Prefektura Shiga
pt: Shiga
ro: Prefectura Shiga
ru: Сига
se: Shiga prefektuvra
sh: Prefektura Šiga
si: ශිගා ප්‍රාන්තය
sk: Šiga
sl: prefektura Šiga
sr: Шига
su: Préféktur Shiga
sv: Shiga prefektur
sw: Mkoa wa Shiga
ta: ஷிகா ப்ரீபெக்ட்டுறே
te: షిగా ప్రిఫెక్చర్
tg: Префектураи Сига
th: จังหวัดชิงะ
tl: Prepektura ng Shiga
tr: Shiga
tt: Сига (префектура)
uk: Префектура Шіґа
ur: شیگا پریفیکچر
vi: Shiga
zh: 滋賀縣

en: Yamanashi Prefecture
af: Yamanashi Prefektuur
ar: ياماناشي
az: Yamanaşi
be: прэфектура Яманасі
bg: Яманаши
bn: ইয়ামানাশি প্রশাসনিক অঞ্চল
ca: prefectura de Yamanashi
ce: Яманаси (префектура)
cs: Prefektura Jamanaši
cy: Yamanashi
da: Yamanashi-præfekturet
de: Präfektur Yamanashi
el: Γιαμανάσι
eo: Gubernio Jamanaŝi
es: Prefectura de Yamanashi
et: Yamanashi prefektuur
eu: Yamanashi
fa: استان یاماناشی
fi: Yamanashin prefektuuri
fr: Préfecture de Yamanashi
ga: Maoracht Yamanashi
gl: Prefectura de Yamanashi
gu: યમાનાશી પ્રીફેકચર
he: יאמאנאשי
hi: यामानाशी प्रीफेक्चर
hr: Yamanashi
hu: Jamanasi prefektúra
hy: Յամանասի (պրեֆեկտուրա)
id: Prefektur Yamanashi
it: prefettura di Yamanashi
ja: 山梨県, 山梨
ka: იამანასის პრეფექტურა
km: ខេត្តយ៉ាម៉ាណាស៊ី
kn: ಯಮನಶಿ ಪ್ರಿಫೆಕ್ಚರ್
ko: 야마나시현
lt: Jamanašio prefektūra
lv: Jamanasi prefektūra
mk: Јаманаши
mr: यामानाशी
ms: Wilayah Yamanashi
nb: Yamanashi prefektur
nl: Yamanashi
nn: Yamanashi prefektur
pl: Prefektura Yamanashi
pt: Yamanashi
ro: Prefectura Yamanashi
ru: Яманаси
se: Yamanashi prefektuvra
sh: Prefektura Jamanaši
si: යමනාශි ප්‍රාන්තය
sk: Jamanaši
sl: Prefektura Jamanaši
sr: Јаманаши
su: Préféktur Yamanashi
sv: Yamanashi prefektur
sw: Mkoa wa Yamanashi
ta: யமானஷி ப்ரீபெக்ட்டுறே
te: యమనాషి ప్రిఫెక్చర్
tg: Префектураи Яманаши
th: จังหวัดยามานาชิ
tl: Prepektura ng Yamanashi
tr: Yamanashi
tt: Яманаси (префектура)
uk: Префектура Яманаші
ur: یماناشی پرفکترے
vi: Yamanashi
zh: 山梨縣

en: Hokkaido
ar: هوكايدو
az: Hokkaydo prefekturası
be: прэфектура Хакайда
ca: prefectura de Hokkaidō
cs: prefektura Hokkaidó
da: Hokkaido prefektur
de: Hokkaidō
el: Χοκκάιντο
eo: Gubernio Hokajdo
es: Prefectura de Hokkaido
et: Hokkaidō prefektuur
fr: Préfecture de Hokkaidō
fy: Prefektuer Hokkaido
ga: Maoracht Hokkaido
he: הוקאידו
hr: Hokkaido, prefektura
hu: Hokkaidó prefektúra
hy: Հոկայդո
id: Prefektur Hokkaido
it: prefettura di Hokkaidō
ja: 北海道
jv: Hokkaido
ko: 홋카이도
lv: Hokaido prefektūra
nb: Hokkaido prefektur
nl: Prefectuur Hokkaido
nn: Hokkaido prefektur
os: Хоккайдо (префектурæ)
pl: prefektura Hokkaido
ro: Prefectura Hokkaidō
ru: Хоккайдо
se: Hokkaidō prefektuvra
sl: Hokaido
sr: Хокаидо
sv: Hokkaido prefektur
tg: Префектураи Ҳоккайдо
th: ฮกไกโด
tt: Хоккайдо (префектура)
uk: Префектура Хоккайдо
zh: 北海道

en: Ibaraki Prefecture
af: Ibaraki Prefektuur
ar: إيباراكي
az: İbaraki prefekturası
ba: Ибараки
be: прэфектура Ібаракі
bg: Ибараки
bn: ইবারাকি প্রশাসনিক অঞ্চল
ca: prefectura d'Ibaraki
ce: Ибараки (префектура)
cs: Prefektura Ibaraki
cy: Ibaraki
da: Ibaraki-præfekturet
de: Präfektur Ibaraki
el: Επαρχία Ιμπαράκι
eo: Gubernio Ibaraki
es: Prefectura de Ibaraki
et: Ibaraki prefektuur
eu: Ibaraki
fa: استان ایباراکی
fi: Ibarakin prefektuuri
fr: préfecture d'Ibaraki
ga: Maoracht Ibaraki
gl: Prefectura de Ibaraki
gu: ઇબારાકી પ્રીફેકચર
he: איבראקי
hi: आईबराकी प्रीफेक्चर
hr: Ibaraki
hu: Ibaraki prefektúra
hy: Իբարակի (պրեֆեկտուրա)
id: Prefektur Ibaraki
it: prefettura di Ibaraki
ja: 茨城県, 茨城
jv: Prefektur Ibaraki
ka: იბარაკის პრეფექტურა
km: ខេត្តអ៊ីបារ៉ាគិ
kn: ಐಬರಾಕಿ ಪ್ರಿಫೆಕ್ಚರ್
ko: 이바라키현
lt: Ibarakio prefektūra
lv: Ibaraki prefektūra
mk: Ибараки
mn: Ибараки
mr: इबाराकी
ms: Wilayah Ibaraki
nb: Ibaraki prefektur
nl: Ibaraki
nn: Ibaraki prefektur
oc: Prefectura d'Ibaraki
pl: Prefektura Ibaraki
pt: Ibaraki
ro: Prefectura Ibaraki
ru: Ибараки
se: Ibaraki prefektuvra
sh: Prefektura Ibaraki
si: ඉබරකි ප්‍රාන්තය
sk: Ibaraki
sl: prefektura Ibaraki
sr: Ибараки
su: Ibaraki Prefecture
sv: Ibaraki prefektur
sw: Mkoa wa Ibaraki
ta: இபராக்கி பிரேபிக்டூர்
te: ఇబరాకి ప్రిఫెక్చర్
tg: Префектураи Ибараки
th: จังหวัดอิบารากิ
tl: Prepektura ng Ibaraki
tr: Ibaraki
tt: Ибараки (префектура)
ug: ئىباراكى ناھىيىسى
uk: Префектура Ібаракі
ur: ایباراکی پریفیکچر
uz: Ibaraki prefekturasi
vi: Ibaraki
zh: 茨城縣

en: Aichi Prefecture
af: Aichi Prefektuur
ar: آيتشي
az: Ayçi prefekturası
ba: Айти
be: прэфектура Айты
bg: Айчи
bn: আইচি প্রশাসনিক অঞ্চল
bo: ཨའི་ཆི་ཞེས་པའི་སྲིད་འཛིན་ས་ཁུལ།
ca: prefectura d'Aichi
ce: Айти (префектура)
cs: Prefektura Aiči
cy: Aichi
da: Aichi-præfekturet
de: Präfektur Aichi
el: Άιτσι
eo: Gubernio Aiĉi
es: Prefectura de Aichi
et: Aichi prefektuur
eu: Aichi
fa: استان آیچی
fi: Aichin prefektuuri
fr: Préfecture d'Aichi
ga: Maoracht Aichi
gl: Prefectura de Aichi
gu: એચી પ્રીફેકચર
he: אאיצ'י
hi: आइची प्रीफ़ेक्चर
hr: Aichi
hu: Aicsi prefektúra
hy: Այչի
id: Prefektur Aichi
it: prefettura di Aichi
ja: 愛知県, 愛知
jv: Prefektur Aichi
ka: აიტის პრეფექტურა
km: ខេត្តអៃឈិ
kn: ಐಚಿ ಪ್ರಿಫೆಕ್ಚರ್
ko: 아이치현
lt: Aičio prefektūra
lv: Aiči
mk: Ајчи
mn: Айчи
mr: ऐची
ms: Wilayah Aichi
nb: Aichi prefektur
nl: Aichi
nn: Aichi prefektur
or: ଆଇଚି ରାଜ୍ଯ
os: Айти (префектурæ)
pa: ਆਇਚੀ ਪ੍ਰੀਫ਼ੈਕਚਰ
pl: Prefektura Aichi
pt: Aichi
ro: Prefectura Aichi
ru: Айти
se: Aichi prefektuvra
sh: Prefektura Aiči
si: අයිචි ප්‍රාන්තය
sk: Aiči
sl: prefektura Aiči
sr: Аичи
su: Préféktur Aichi
sv: Aichi prefektur
sw: Mkoa wa Aichi
ta: ஆட்சி பிரேபிக்ச்சர்
te: అయిచి ప్రిఫెక్చర్
tg: Префектураи Айчи
th: จังหวัดไอจิ
tl: Prepektura ng Aichi
tr: Aichi
tt: Айти (префектура)
uk: Префектура Айчі
ur: ایچی پریفیکچر
vi: Aichi
zh: 愛知縣

en: Osaka Prefecture
af: Osaka Prefektuur
ar: أوساكا
az: Osaka prefekturası
ba: Осака (префектура)
be: прэфектура Осака
bg: Осака
bn: ওসাকা প্রশাসনিক অঞ্চল
ca: prefectura d'Ōsaka
ce: Осака (префектура)
cs: Prefektura Ósaka
cy: Osaka
da: Osaka-præfekturet
de: Präfektur Osaka
el: Οσάκα
eo: Gubernio Osaka
es: Prefectura de Osaka
et: Ōsaka prefektuur
eu: Osaka prefektura
fa: استان اوساکا
fi: Osakan prefektuuri
fr: préfecture d'Osaka
ga: Maoracht Osaka
gl: Prefectura de Ōsaka
gu: ઓસાકા પ્રીફેકચર
he: מחוז אוסקה
hi: ओसाका प्रीफेक्चर
hr: Ōsaka
hu: Oszaka prefektúra
hy: Օսակայի պրեֆեկտուրա
id: Prefektur Osaka
it: prefettura di Osaka
ja: 大阪府, 大阪
jv: Prefektur Osaka
ka: ოსაკის პრეფექტურა
km: អាណាខេត្តអូសាកា
kn: ಒಸಾಕಾ ಪ್ರಿಫೆಕ್ಚರ್
ko: 오사카부
la: Osaka (praefectura)
lt: Osakos prefektūra
lv: Osakas prefektūra
mk: Осака
mr: ओसाका
ms: Wilayah Osaka
nb: Osaka prefektur
nl: Osaka
nn: Osaka prefektur
os: Осакæ
pl: Prefektura Osaka
pt: Osaka
ro: Prefectura Osaka
ru: Осака
se: Ōsaka prefektuvra
sh: Prefektura Osaka
si: ඔසාකා ප්‍රාන්තය
sk: Prefektura Osaky
sl: prefektura Osaka
sr: Осака
su: Osaka Prefecture
sv: Osaka prefektur
sw: Mkoa wa Osaka
ta: ஒசாகா ப்ரீபெக்ட்டுர்
te: ఓసాకా ప్రిఫెక్చర్
tg: Префектураи Осака
th: จังหวัดโอซากะ
tl: Prepektura ng Osaka
tr: Osaka ili
tt: Осака (префектура)
uk: Префектура Осака
ur: اوساکا پریفیکچر
vi: Ōsaka
zh: 大阪府

en: Tottori Prefecture
af: Tottori Prefektuur
ar: توتوري
az: Tottori prefekturası
be: прэфектура Таторы
bg: Тотори
bn: তোত্তোরি প্রশাসনিক অঞ্চল
ca: prefectura de Tottori
ce: Тоттори (префектура)
cs: Prefektura Tottori
cy: Tottori
da: Tottori-præfekturet
de: Präfektur Tottori
el: Τόττορι
eo: Gubernio Tottori
es: Prefectura de Tottori
et: Tottori prefektuur
eu: Tottori
fa: استان توتوری
fi: Tottorin prefektuuri
fr: Préfecture de Tottori
ga: Maoracht Tottori
gl: Prefectura de Tottori
gu: ટોટ્ટોરી પ્રીફેકચર
he: טוטורי
hi: तोतोरी प्रान्त
hr: Tottori
hu: Tottori prefektúra
hy: Տոթթորի
id: Prefektur Tottori
it: prefettura di Tottori
ja: 鳥取県, 鳥取
jv: Prefektur Tottori
ka: ტოტორის პრეფექტურა
kn: ಟೊಟ್ಟೊರಿ ಪ್ರಿಫೆಕ್ಚರ್
ko: 돗토리현
lt: Totorio prefektūra
lv: Totori prefektūra
mk: Тотори
mr: तोतोरी
ms: Wilayah Tottori
nb: Tottori prefektur
nl: Tottori
nn: Tottori prefektur
oc: prefectura de Tottori
pl: Prefektura Tottori
pt: Tottori
ro: Prefectura Tottori
ru: Тоттори
se: Tottori prefektuvra
sh: Prefektura Totori
si: ටෝට්ටෝරි ප්‍රාන්තය
sk: Tottori
sr: Тотори
su: Tottori Prefecture
sv: Tottori prefektur
sw: Mkoa wa Tottori
ta: டோட்டோரி ப்ரீபெக்ட்டுறே
te: టాటోరి ప్రిఫెక్చర్
tg: Префектураи Тоттори
th: จังหวัดทตโตริ
tl: Prepektura ng Tottori
tr: Tottori
tt: Тоттори (префектура)
uk: Префектура Тотторі
ur: توتوری پریفیکچر
vi: Tottori
zh: 鳥取縣

en: Shimane Prefecture
af: Shimane Prefektuur
ar: شيمانه
az: Şimane prefekturası
ba: Симанэ
be: прэфектура Сіманэ
bg: Шимане
bn: শিমানে প্রশাসনিক অঞ্চল
ca: prefectura de Shimane
ce: Симане (префектура)
cs: Prefektura Šimane
cy: Shimane
da: Shimane-præfekturet
de: Präfektur Shimane
el: Σιμάνε
eo: Gubernio Ŝimane
es: Prefectura de Shimane
et: Shimane prefektuur
eu: Shimane
fa: استان شیمانه
fi: Shimanen prefektuuri
fr: Préfecture de Shimane
ga: Maoracht Shimane
gl: Prefectura de Shimane
gu: શિમૅન પ્રીફેકચર
he: שימאנה
hi: शिमाने प्रीफेक्चर
hr: Shimane
hu: Simane prefektúra
hy: Սիմանե (պրեֆեկտուրա)
id: Prefektur Shimane
it: prefettura di Shimane
ja: 島根県, 島根
ka: სიმანეს პრეფექტურა
km: ខេត្តស៊ីម៉ាណិ
kn: ಶಿಮಾನ್ ಪ್ರಿಫೆಕ್ಚರ್
ko: 시마네현
lt: Šimanės prefektūra
lv: Simanes prefektūra
mk: Шимане
mr: शिमाने
ms: Wilayah Shimane
nb: Shimane prefektur
nl: Shimane
nn: Shimane prefektur
pl: Prefektura Shimane
ps: شیمانه
pt: Shimane
ro: Prefectura Shimane
ru: Симане
se: Shimane prefektuvra
sh: Prefektura Šimane
si: ශිමානේ ප්‍රාන්තය
sk: Šimane
sl: prefektura Šimane
sr: Шимане
su: Shimane Prefecture
sv: Shimane prefektur
sw: Mkoa wa Shimane
ta: ஷிம்மனே ப்ரீபெக்ட்டுறே
te: షిమేన్ ప్రిఫెక్చర్
tg: Префектураи Симанэ
th: จังหวัดชิมาเนะ
tl: Prepektura ng Shimane
tr: Shimane
tt: Симане (префектура)
uk: Префектура Шімане
ur: شیمانے پریفیکچر
vi: Shimane
zh: 島根縣